Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 6. Disposal of Unclaimed Human Bodies

§ 35-4-601.
Delivery of unclaimed bodies for anatomical study.

Any member of the following boards or officers to-wit: The board of health of any city, town or county in the state; the mayor or common council of any city, and the officers or board having direction or control of any almshouse, prison hospital, house of correction or jail, in the state, shall, when so requested, surrender the dead bodies of such persons as may be required to be buried at the public expense, to any regularly licensed physician or dentist or medical college in the state or to a person certified by a state or local law enforcement agency to train search and rescue animals, in accordance with such rules as may be prescribed by the state department of health; such bodies to be used by said physician, dentist, medical college or person, for the advancement of anatomical science or the training of search and rescue animals; preference being given to the faculty of any legally organized state medical college or school of anatomy, for their use in the instruction of medical students; provided that in no case shall the faculties or other officers of such medical college or school of anatomy require or receive from any medical student or students, for such body so furnished therein, any sum of money in excess of the actual cost of procuring the same.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 37, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3619; R.S. 1931, § 55-101; C.S. 1945, § 63-801; W.S. 1957, § 35-212; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2011, ch. 93, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to use of dead human bodies by embalming schools, see §

33-16-107

.

The 2011 amendment,

provided for use of human remains by persons certified to train search and rescue animals.

Laws 2011, ch. 93, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Dead bodies: liability for improper manner of reinterment, 53 ALR4th 394.

§ 35-4-602.
Exceptions as to certain bodies.

No such body shall in any case be surrendered if:

The deceased in his or her last illness requested to be not dissected; or

If within forty-eight (48) hours after his or her death, any person of kindred or a friend of the deceased shall request the body for burial; or

If such deceased was a stranger or a traveler who died suddenly before making himself or herself known; or

If such deceased person was honorably discharged from any arm of the military or naval service of the United States.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 37, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 3620; R.S. 1931, § 55-102; C.S. 1945, § 63-802; W.S. 1957, § 35-213.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-4-603.
Restriction upon use of bodies; bond required of applicant; prohibited acts.

It shall not be lawful for any person so receiving dead bodies to use the same, except for the prosecution of anatomical science or the training of search and rescue animals, or elsewhere than in this state; and the state department of health in its rules and regulations in regard to the distribution of the same, may require each applicant to furnish a good and sufficient bond that the provisions of this act [§§

35-4-601

through

35-4-607

] will be observed. Whosoever shall use said body for any other purpose, or shall remove the same beyond the limits of the state, or whosoever shall traffic, trade or deal with said bodies for a commercial purpose shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined, on conviction, not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) and be imprisoned in the county jail for a period of not less than thirty (30) days or more than one (1) year; the fine accruing from said conviction to be paid to the school fund of the county, wherein such offense was committed.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 37, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 3621; R.S. 1931, § 55-103; C.S. 1945, § 63-803; W.S. 1957, § 35-214; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2011, ch. 93, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for molesting graves or stealing or mutilating human bodies, see §§

6-4-501

,

6-4-502

.

The 2011 amendment,

added “or the training of search and rescue animals.”

Laws 2011, ch. 93, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

§ 35-4-604.
Penalty for refusing to deliver body.

Any officer refusing to deliver the remains or dead body of the deceased person, when demanded in accordance with the provisions of this act [§§

35-4-601

through

35-4-607

] and the rules and regulations set forth by the state department of health, shall pay a penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00), nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00); such penalties to be sued for by the department of health as the case may be.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 37, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 3622; R.S. 1931, § 55-104; C.S. 1945, § 63-804; W.S. 1957, § 35-216; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-4-605.
Burial or cremation after use.

It shall be the duty of all parties, who may secure dead bodies under provisions of this act [§§

35-4-601

through

35-4-607

], to bury the same decently in some public cemetery within a reasonable time after dissection or use, or cremate the same or make such other disposition as may be prescribed by the state department of health. For any violation of this provision, the party or parties so neglecting shall on conviction, forfeit or pay a penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00), nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or be imprisoned in the county jail not less than six (6) months nor more than twelve (12) months or both, at the discretion of the court; such penalties to be sued for by the school officers or anyone interested therein, for the benefit of the school fund of the county in which the offense shall have been committed.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 37, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 3623; R.S. 1931, § 55-105; C.S. 1945, § 63-805; W.S. 1957, § 35-216; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2011, ch. 93, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

added “or use” after “time after dissection.”

Laws 2011, ch. 93, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of statutes making it a criminal offense to mistreat or wrongfully dispose of dead body, 81 ALR3d 1071.

Homicide: cremation of victim's body as violation of accused's rights, 70 ALR4th 1091.

§ 35-4-606.
Rules and regulations.

The state department of health shall, within thirty (30) days after passage of this act [§§

35-4-601

through

35-4-607

], promulgate rules and regulations as called for by W.S.

35-4-601

.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 37, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 3624; R.S. 1931, § 55-106; C.S. 1945, § 63-806; W.S. 1957, § 35-217; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-4-607.
Who may have bodies in possession.

Any regularly licensed physician or dentist of the state, any medical student who is a regular matriculate of a recognized medical college, under authority of such physician, any person certified by a state or local law enforcement agency to train search and rescue animals or any person authorized by the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act may have in his possession human dead bodies, or parts thereof, lawfully obtained, for the purpose of anatomical inquiry or dissection or for training of search and rescue animals.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 37, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 3625; R.S. 1931, § 55-107; C.S. 1945, § 63-807; W.S. 1957, § 35-218; Laws 2009, ch. 97, § 2; 2011, ch. 93, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to use of dead human bodies by embalming schools, see §

33-16-107

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “or any person authorized by the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act.”

The 2011 amendment,

provided for use of human remains by persons certified to train search and rescue animals.

Laws 2011, ch. 93, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 8, ch. 37, Laws 1917, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.